Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.090

Revolving fund—Depositories for fund, bond or security for—Manner of payments from fund.

The surplus and donated food commodities revolving fund shall be deposited by the superintendent in such banks as he or she may select, but any such depository shall furnish a surety bond executed by a surety company or companies authorized to do business in the state of Washington, or collateral eligible as security for deposit of state funds, in at least the full amount of the deposit in each depository bank. Moneys shall be paid from the surplus and donated food commodities revolving fund by voucher and check in such form and in such manner as shall be prescribed by the superintendent.

[ 1990 c 33 s 244; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.060. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 92 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.30.060, 28.30.060.]